Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 10

Nursing Home Assessment Trust Fund

71-5-1001. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account” means the nursing home assessment trust fund created under this part;

“Bureau” means the bureau of TennCare;

“Commencement date” means the later of July 1, 2014, or the date when the bureau has received the necessary federal approval to implement the assessment described in this part and implements the provisions of the nursing home assessment trust fund;

“Continuing care retirement community” means an entity or organization that offers on a single campus setting a continuum of services and facilities for each resident including single and congregate dwellings, assisted living units, and nursing facility services, pursuant to a contract between a resident and a provider by which the resident pays a fee for the right to occupy a space in a designated facility and to receive continuing care for life. Entities or organizations defined in this part shall have a minimum ratio of independent/assisted living beds to nursing facility beds of one-to-one;

“Fiscal year” (FY) means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st and ending June 30th of each calendar year;

“Fund” as used in this part shall mean the nursing home assessment trust fund created under this part;

“Medicaid” has the same meaning as “medical assistance” as defined in § 71-5-103;

“Medicare resident day” means a resident day funded under 42 U.S.C. Chapter 7 (Title XVIII of the Social Security Act) commonly referred to as the Medicare program Parts A-D;

“Net patient service revenue” means gross inpatient revenues from services provided to nursing home patients less reductions from gross inpatient revenue resulting from an inability to collect payment of charges. Inpatient care revenue excludes non-patient care revenue such as beauty and barber, vending income, interest and contributions, revenues from the sale of meals and all outpatient revenues. Reductions from gross revenue include bad debts, contractual adjustments, uncompensated care, discounts and adjustments and other revenue deductions;

“Nursing facility” means any entity defined as a nursing home under § 68-11-201 and licensed under title 68 by the department of health;

“Resident day” means a calendar day of care provided to a nursing home resident, including the day of admission and excluding the day of discharge; provided, that one (1) resident day shall be deemed to exist when admission and discharge occur on the same day; and

“Upper payment limit” means the limitation established pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 447.272 that disallows federal matching funds when state medicaid agencies pay certain classes of nursing care facilities an aggregate amount for services furnished by that class of nursing care facilities that would exceed the amount that would be paid under medicare payment principles.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

71-5-1002. Legislative intent — Creation of nursing home assessment trust fund.

It is declared to be the legislative intent that every person is exercising a taxable privilege who engages in the business of providing nursing home care. The assessment fee imposed by this part shall be in addition to all other privilege taxes.

The nursing home assessment trust fund is created. The general assembly intends that the proceeds of the annual assessment not be used as a justification to reduce or eliminate the state funding to the TennCare program. The fund shall not be used to replace any moneys otherwise appropriated to the TennCare program by the general assembly.

The trust fund shall consist of:

Amounts collected or received by the bureau from nursing home assessments under this part;

Investment earnings credited to the assets of the nursing home assessment trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest amounts deposited within the account in accordance with law, and all investment earnings shall be credited back to the fund; and

Any penalties levied in conjunction with the administration of this part.

The trust fund is created for the purpose of receiving funds as specified in this section. Collected assessment funds shall be used to secure federal matching funds available through the state medicaid plan.

All revenue collected pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the nursing home assessment trust fund.

All nursing home annual assessment fee payments made by nursing homes under this section and received by this state; all investment earnings credited to the nursing home annual assessment fee payments; any interest and penalties paid under this section by any nursing home; and all funds generated by federal matching payments made relative to the nursing home annual assessment fee shall be available to and used by the bureau of TennCare for the sole purpose of providing payment to nursing homes.

No part of the nursing home annual assessment fee payments made by nursing homes under this section and received by this state; the investment earnings credited to the nursing home annual assessment fee payments; the interest and penalties paid under this section by any nursing home; or the funds generated by federal matching payments made relative to the nursing home annual assessment fee shall be used for any purpose other than providing payment to nursing homes.

The fund shall be used exclusively for the following purposes:

To make expenditures for nursing facility services under the TennCare program for FY 2020-2021 at the full rates for the specified fiscal year as provided for under bureau of TennCare rules relative to the acuity- and quality-based reimbursement system and in accordance with § 71-5-105(a)(3)(B);

To provide funding for the implementation of an acuity-based reimbursement system that shall include at a minimum a quality performance component for nursing facility services and a nursing rate component. The nursing rate component shall be adjusted by the average medicaid case-mix of the facility utilizing the Skilled Nursing Facility (SNF) Prospective Payment System (PPS) Resource Utilization Group-Version 4 (RUG-IV), 48-Grouper model; and

To pay nursing home covered services covered for medicaid beneficiaries within medicare upper payment limits, as negotiated with the bureau of TennCare. The upper payment limit of all nursing homes shall be calculated by the bureau of TennCare using the higher of the cost-based or prospective payment system approach in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 447.272.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Any funds remaining in the nursing home assessment trust fund after payments are made as provided for in subsection (h) shall remain in the trust fund as a reserve for future uses consistent with subsection (h). If the funds in the nursing home assessment trust fund are insufficient to meet all the purposes established in § 71-5-1004(b), the bureau of TennCare shall not be required to procure additional funding from other sources to make the payments noted in § 71-5-1004(b), but instead shall be permitted to reduce all payments on a pro rata basis so as not to exceed the amounts held at any time in the nursing home assessment trust fund.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 2; 2016, ch. 883, § 1; 2017, ch. 377, § 1; 2018, ch. 836, § 2; 2019, ch. 423, § 1; 2020, ch. 644, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “FY 2019-2020” for “FY 2018-2019” following “under the TennCare program for” in (h)(1); and deleted former (h)(4) which read: “Not later than June 30, 2018, a one-time transfer in the amount of fifteen million one hundred seventy-three thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($15,173,125) shall be made from the nursing home trust fund to the bureau of TennCare. The payment equals the amount of TennCare funds that were used in fiscal years 2014-2015 and 2015-2016 to fund nursing home expenditures due to a budgetary restriction on the amount of nursing home fees that could be used.”

The 2020 amendment substituted “FY 2020-2021” for “FY 2019-2020” in (h)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 423, § 14. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 644, § 9. July 1, 2020.

71-5-1003. Payment of assessments — Determination of rate — Time for payment.

Each nursing home shall pay the nursing home assessment in quarterly installments to the account in accordance with this part. In the event of a change of ownership or management of a nursing facility, the successor entity shall be liable for all unpaid nursing home assessment fees, penalties, and interest, and full payment of those fees, penalties, and interest shall be a precondition to the successor entity obtaining a TennCare identification number.

The aggregated amount of assessments for all nursing facilities during a fiscal year shall not be less than the amount necessary to fund this part or exceed the maximum amount that may be assessed pursuant to the indirect guarantee threshold as established pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68(f)(3)(i). The bureau shall determine the assessment rate prospectively for the applicable fiscal year on a per-resident-day basis, exclusive of medicare resident days. The per-resident day assessment rate shall be established pursuant to subsection (c). The bureau shall promulgate rules for facility reporting of non-medicare resident days and for payment of the assessment.

The total aggregated amount of assessments for all nursing facilities from July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, shall equal four and three-quarters percent (4.75%) of the net patient service revenue. The total aggregated amount of assessment for all nursing facilities, and the annual assessment determined for each nursing facility, shall be established on July 1 of each year. Once established, neither amount shall vary during each fiscal year. Each nursing facility shall have an annual assessment amount that shall be determined as follows:

Any licensed nursing home that is licensed on July 1, 2020, for fifty (50) beds or fewer shall pay an assessment rate equal to three percent (3%) of net patient service revenue, divided by all non-medicare days. The facility shall pay the per diem rate for each of its non-medicare days;

Any licensed nursing home that on July 1, 2020, operates as part of a continuing care retirement community shall pay an assessment rate equal to three percent (3%) of net patient service revenue, divided by all non-medicare days. The facility shall pay the per diem rate for each of its non-medicare days;

Any licensed nursing home that is licensed on July 1, 2020, and provided forty thousand (40,000) or greater medicaid patient days for the twelve (12) months ending December 31 of the prior year shall pay an assessment rate equal to two and one half percent (2.50%) of net patient service revenue divided by all non-medicare patient days. The facility shall pay the per diem rate for each of its non-medicare days;

Any new nursing home facility that is initially licensed and commences operations after July 1, 2020, shall pay in FY 2020-2021 a prorated assessment equal to two thousand two hundred twenty-five dollars ($2,225) per licensed bed per year, prorated to accrue from the date the nursing facility became certified to participate in TennCare. The change in ownership of an existing licensed facility shall not meet the requirements of this subdivision (c)(4);

Any licensed nursing home not meeting the criteria of subdivisions (c)(1)-(4) shall pay an equal per facility annual assessment amount at such amount as is necessary to ensure that the total aggregated amount of assessment for all nursing facilities from July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, shall equal four and three-quarters percent (4.75%) of the net patient service revenue, when such total aggregated assessment amount is established on July 1 of each year;

Any excess collections of per facility annual assessments above the targeted four and three-quarters percent (4.75%) of the net patient service revenue shall be retained in the nursing home assessment trust fund account created under this part. Should actual collections of per facility annual assessments not equal the targeted four and three-quarters percent (4.75%) of the net patient service revenue, any shortfall may be made up from funds in the nursing home assessment trust fund account created under this part, or from other appropriations to the TennCare program; and

Any facility that ceases to be licensed by the department of health shall not be required to pay assessment fees accruing after the date of its licensure termination.

Each nursing home shall pay its nursing home annual assessment fee as set forth in subsection (c) in equal quarterly installments, with the first quarterly installment due on the fifteenth day of the first month of the first quarter of the state fiscal year after the bureau of TennCare has satisfied the requirements of subsection (f) [deleted]. Subsequent installments shall be due on the fifteenth day of the first month of the three (3) successive calendar quarters following the calendar quarter in which the first installment is due.

Nursing homes shall not create a separate line-item charge on the bill reflecting the assessment.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 883, §§ 2, 3, 12, 13; 2017, ch. 377, § 2; 2018, ch. 836, §§ 3-5; 2019, ch. 423, §§ 2-7; 2020, ch. 644, §§ 2-7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Subsection (f) of this section, which is referred to in (d), was deleted pursuant to 2018, ch. 836, § 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment in (c) and (c)(5) substituted “from July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2020” for “from July 1, 2018, through June 30, 2019”; in (c)(1)-(c)(3) substituted “July 1, 2019” for “July 1, 2018”; and in (c)(4) substituted “after July 1, 2019, shall pay in FY 2019-2020” for “after July 1, 2018, shall pay in FY 2018-2019”.

The 2020 amendment substituted “from July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021” for “from July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2020” and “July 1, 2020” for “July 1, 2019” throughout (c); and substituted “after July 1, 2020, shall pay in FY 2020-2021” for “after July 1, 2019, shall pay in FY 2019-2020” in (c)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 423, § 14. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 644, § 9. July 1, 2020.

71-5-1004. Quality-based component of reimbursement methodology for nursing facility services.

A specified amount of the funding for nursing facility (NF) services shall be set aside during each fiscal year for purposes of calculating a quality-based component of each NF provider's per diem payment as a quality incentive component, which shall be in addition to quality informed aspects of the NF reimbursement methodology.

At the outset of the implementation of these acuity and quality-based reimbursement systems, the amount of funding set aside for the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology for nursing facilities shall be no less than forty million dollars ($40,000,000) or four percent (4%) of the total projected fiscal year expenditures for NF services, whichever is greater.

In each subsequent year, the amount of funding set aside for the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology for nursing facilities shall increase at two (2) times the rate of inflation of the index factor. Index factor inflation shall be calculated from the midpoint of the prior state fiscal year to the midpoint of the new state fiscal year.

This annual quality-based component index factor adjustment shall continue until such time that the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology for nursing facilities constitutes ten percent (10%) of the total projected fiscal year expenditures for NF services. Once the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology constitutes ten percent (10%) of the total projected fiscal year expenditures for NF services, it shall then increase or decrease at a rate necessary to ensure that the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology remains at ten percent (10%).

All noted minimum quality-based component thresholds and index factor inflationary adjustments are made prior to consideration of the budget adjustment factor (BAF).

The base-year annualized medicaid resident day-weighted median costs and prices shall be rebased at an interval no longer than three (3) years after a new base year period has been established. The new base year median costs and prices will be established using the most recently audited or desk reviewed cost reports that have a cost reporting period greater than six (6) months, with a cost report end date eighteen (18) months or more before the start of the rebase period.

Cost reports issued a disclaimer of opinion during the audit process or cost reports containing substantial issues, including incomplete filing, during the desk review process, as solely determined by the comptroller of the treasury, will be excluded from the median and price calculations.

Only audited or reviewed cost reports available prior to the July 1 rate setting will be considered in the median and price calculations.

The initial quality outcome measures and point values established for the NF reimbursement system implemented on July 1, 2018, shall be based upon the structure of the QuILTSS criteria established by the bureau of TennCare on August 5, 2014. The bureau of TennCare may establish quality outcome measures and performance benchmarks by rulemaking consistent with this section.

Quality outcome measures and performance benchmarks for each measure shall not be modified for the first three (3) fiscal years of reimbursement unless agreed to by TennCare in consultation with the Tennessee Health Care Association (THCA). After the initial three (3) year period, quality outcome measures, performance benchmarks for each measure, and point values shall be established in consultation with THCA. Any modifications to such criteria shall be established through rulemaking and shall not be changed for another three-year period.

Any submissions by any facility relating to documentation of and participation in the quality-based component of the reimbursement methodology for nursing facilities shall be confidential and privileged and shall be protected from direct or indirect means of discovery, subpoena, or admission into evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding. However, nothing in this rule shall be construed to make immune from discovery or use in any judicial or administrative proceeding information, record, or documents that are otherwise available from original sources kept in the facility, and would otherwise be available to a litigant through discovery requested from the facility. The confidentiality provisions of this subsection (d) shall also not apply to any judicial or administrative proceeding contesting the determination of the bureau of TennCare regarding the facility's quality component reimbursement.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 5; 2016, ch. 883, §§ 4-8; 2017, ch. 377, § 3; 2018, ch. 836, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

71-5-1005. Bureau to seek federal approvals if necessary — Bureau authorized to adopt rules and regulations to implement part.

The bureau shall seek necessary federal approval in the form of state plan amendments in order to implement this part, if it determined such approvals are necessary.

The bureau is authorized to adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this part or obtain approval of the state plan amendments. However, § 71-5-1413 shall be the exclusive authority for rulemaking by the bureau of TennCare regarding the initial rules regarding the acuity-based nursing home reimbursement system and any subsequent modifications to the nursing home reimbursement system.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2017, ch. 377, § 4; 2018, ch. 836, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

71-5-1006. Penalties for late payment — Payment plan — Proceedings before board — Waiver of penalties — Fees in abeyance.

If any part of any assessment fee imposed by § 71-5-1003 is not paid on or before the due date, a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount due shall at once accrue and be added to such assessment fee. Thereafter, on the first day of each month during which any part of any assessment fee or any prior accrued penalty remains unpaid, an additional penalty of five percent (5%) of the then unpaid balance shall accrue and be added to such assessment fee or prior accrued penalty. Payment shall be deemed to have been made upon date of deposit in the United States mail.

The bureau of TennCare may for good cause approve an alternative payment plan, as long as full payment of the assessment fee plus any penalties are made. So long as the facility is current with payment of the current assessment and any authorized payment plan approved by the bureau of TennCare, no further penalties will be applied. Any payments after a penalty is assessed under this section shall be credited first to unpaid assessment amounts rather than to penalty amounts, beginning with the most delinquent installment. The bureau of TennCare may, as part of an approved payment plan, waive, in whole or in part, any penalty or interest imposed under this section. A waiver shall excuse the payment of that penalty or interest amount but shall not excuse payment of any assessments. Nothing in this section shall require the bureau of TennCare to agree to or approve any waiver under this section, and the waivers shall only be approved after the bureau’s determination that there is good cause for the waiver.

If a nursing facility fails to pay a quarterly installment of the nursing home assessment fee within thirty (30) days of its due date or becomes or is in arrears for payment of its nursing home assessment fee on the first day of the state fiscal year, and does not have an approved payment plan for which payments are current, the bureau of TennCare shall direct its contracted managed care organizations (MCOs) to recover the full amount of the then-outstanding nursing home assessment fee and any applicable penalties and interest, which shall be accomplished through recoupment from payments made by the MCOs to nursing facilities to recover the full amount of the then-outstanding nursing home assessment fee and any related penalties and interest. TennCare MCOs shall remit promptly any of these recouped payments to the bureau of TennCare. The bureau of TennCare may recoup such amounts in as few or as many installment payments as it deems appropriate.

If a nursing facility is more than ninety (90) days delinquent in paying any installment of its annual nursing home assessment fee; or becomes delinquent in any approved payment plan by more than ninety (90) days or fails to provide timely payment of any and all subsequent quarterly installments of its annual nursing home assessment fee while past due amounts are being recouped pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the bureau of TennCare shall:

Initiate a proceeding before the board for licensing health care facilities, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, for the purpose of having the board indefinitely suspend admissions to the facility until all outstanding nursing home assessment fees and applicable penalties and interest have been repaid. Failure of a nursing facility to pay a quarterly installment of the nursing home assessment fee, or any penalties or interest required to be paid by this part, shall be considered by the board to be a license deficiency; and

Initiate proceedings to terminate the nursing facility’s TennCare identification number.

Upon initiation of a proceeding before the board for licensing healthcare facilities by the bureau of TennCare pursuant to subdivision (c)(2), the board shall suspend admissions to the facility after the bureau of TennCare meets the burden of proof required by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. The board shall have no discretion to impose any sanction or take any action other than that set out in this subdivision (c)(3) in the proceeding. Immediately following the full payment by the facility, or its successor, of all then-outstanding assessment fees and any applicable penalties and interest, any suspension of admissions to the nursing facility imposed according to this section shall be automatically lifted without requiring further action by the board, so long as the full payment of then-outstanding amounts are made within the sixty (60) days immediately following the date of the suspension of admissions.

On or after the sixtieth day following the date of suspension of admissions to the nursing facility if either the nursing facility fails to pay all then-outstanding nursing home assessment fees and any applicable penalties and interest accrued thereon or the nursing facility fails to be current on the terms of its payment plan if a plan is in place, then the bureau of TennCare shall initiate proceedings before the board for licensing healthcare facilities in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act for the purpose of revoking the nursing facility’s license. Upon initiation of a proceeding before the board by the bureau of TennCare pursuant to this subdivision (c)(4), the board shall revoke the nursing facility’s license upon the bureau of TennCare meeting the burden of proof required by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. The board shall have no discretion to impose any sanction or take any action other than that set out in this subdivision (c)(4) in the proceeding.

Revocation of either the nursing facility’s license or the nursing facility’s TennCare identification number shall not remedy, discharge, satisfy, or otherwise extinguish the nursing facility’s liability for the then-outstanding nursing home assessment fees and any related penalties and interest.

Upon revocation of the nursing facility’s license or termination of the nursing facility’s TennCare identification number, the nursing facility shall be required to reapply for a license, TennCare identification number, or both the license and the identification number, in order to provide services to the TennCare population. As a condition of reapplication, the nursing facility, or its successor shall pay in full all then-outstanding nursing home assessment fees, penalties, and interest.

Notwithstanding this part, the bureau of TennCare is authorized to file a civil action against a covered nursing facility and its controlling person or persons to collect any nursing home assessment fees, penalties, and interest when such fees, penalties, and interest have been delinquent for more than ninety (90) days. The bureau of TennCare shall have the right to pursue a civil action pursuant to this subdivision (c)(7) simultaneously while pursuing actions in subdivisions (c)(2) and (4). The bureau of TennCare shall be entitled to receive, in addition to the nursing home assessment fees, penalties, and interest, all reasonable costs of litigation, including attorneys’ fees and court costs, incurred by it in bringing a civil action under this subdivision (c)(7). Exclusive jurisdiction and venue for a civil action authorized in this subdivision (c)(7) shall be in the chancery court for Davidson County. For the purposes of this subdivision (c)(7), “controlling person or persons” means any and all natural persons or entities that own more than fifty percent (50%) of the nursing facility, or the natural person or persons, entity or entities that is or are the majority owner of the nursing facility if no owner owns more than fifty percent (50%) of the nursing facility.

Unless otherwise agreed to by the bureau of TennCare and the nursing facility, full payment to the bureau of TennCare of any outstanding nursing home assessment fees, and any applicable penalties and interest, shall be required for the continuation of the nursing facility’s ongoing certification as a medicaid provider.

Any facility that is delinquent on the payment of its nursing home annual assessment fee imposed by law for any current or prior fiscal year shall establish a payment plan as provided for in this section.

If a facility has established a payment plan concerning the delinquency that has been approved by the bureau of TennCare, then all fees and penalties imposed by this section must not be imposed so long as the facility is current with its payment plan, and no interest must accrue on any balance unpaid as of the due date for that amount.

If a facility has not established a payment plan approved by the bureau of TennCare, then the bureau has the authority to recoup the amount of any delinquent payments as provided for in this section, and such amounts must be applied to reduce the unpaid balance of any nursing home assessment fees owed by the facility.

Any licensed facility that changes its licensure status to inactive status pursuant to § 68-11-206(b) shall be entitled to request that its nursing home annual assessment fee be held in abeyance until such time as the facility returns to active status, at which time the facility shall resume payment of the annual assessment fee that was held in abeyance. During the abeyance because of inactive status, the facility shall not be determined to be delinquent pursuant to this section. Nothing in this subsection (f) shall operate to excuse any licensee from the payment of its nursing home annual assessment fee.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 6; 2016, ch. 883, §§ 14, 15; 2017, ch. 377, § 5; 2018, ch. 836, § 8; 2019, ch. 423, §§ 8, 9.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “on the first day of the state fiscal year” for “on July 1, 2018” following “its nursing home assessment fee” in (c)(1); substituted “imposed by law for any current or prior fiscal year shall establish a payment” for “as provided for in §68-11-216 as of July 16, 2014, must establish a payment” in (e)(1); in (e)(2) substituted “then all fees and penalties imposed by this section must not be imposed” for “all fees and penalties imposed by this section shall not be imposed” and substituted “the due date for that amount” for “July 1, 2014” at the end; and rewrote (e)(3), which read: “If a facility has not established a payment plan approved by the bureau of TennCare by August 15, 2014, the bureau shall have the authority to recoup the amount of any supplemental transitional payments as provided for in §71-5-1004(b)(2)(A)-(C) (now (c)(1)-(3)), and such amounts shall be applied to reduce the unpaid balance of any nursing home assessment fees owed by the facility.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 423, § 14. July 1, 2019.

71-5-1007. Requirements for nursing homes participating in medicaid program — Penalties for noncompliance — Waiver of penalties.

For the purposes of this part, any nursing home participating in the medicaid program shall file cost reports in accordance with the rules adopted by the bureau. Any nursing home participating in the medicaid program that does not adopt the uniform classification of accounts, or other acceptable accounting methods as shall be established by the rules of the bureau, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Health Care Association, or does not submit cost data as required by the bureau, shall be assessed a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day such provider is not in compliance with this section. The bureau may waive, in whole or in part, any penalty upon a determination that there is good cause for such a waiver. The penalty imposed by this section shall supersede any penalty imposed under §12-4-304.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

71-5-1008. Oversight authority of fiscal review committee.

The fiscal review committee shall review and have oversight of the implementation of this part and the nursing home assessment trust fund.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

71-5-1009. Enactment of part does not excuse payment of assessment fee.

Enactment of this part and any amendments to this part shall not operate to excuse the monthly installment payment of any nursing home assessment fee due during any current or prior fiscal year.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 7; 2016, ch. 883, § 9; 2019, ch. 423, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “nursing home assessment fee due during any current or prior fiscal year” for “nursing home assessment fee due prior to July 1, 2016” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 423, § 14. July 1, 2019.

71-5-1010. Termination of fee — Suspension of assessment.

The nursing home annual assessment fee established by this part shall terminate on June 30, 2021.

The assessment imposed by this part shall be suspended if the bureau attempts to utilize the money in the account for any use other than permitted by this part.

Any assessment fee obligation imposed by § 71-5-1003 shall be suspended to the extent that, and for the period that receipt of the assessment fee by the state results in, a corresponding reduction in federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.).

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, § 8; 2016, ch. 883, § 10; 2018, ch. 836, § 9; 2019, ch. 423, § 11; 2020, ch. 644, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1 purported to enact title 71, chapter 5, part 28. This part was designated as title 71, chapter 5, part 10 by the authority of the code commission.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “June 30, 2020” for “June 30, 2019” in (a).

The 2020 amendment substituted “June 30, 2021” for “June 30, 2020” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 423, § 14. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 644, § 9. July 1, 2020.

71-5-1011. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 859, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, §§ 9, 10; repealed by 2019, ch. 423, § 12, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-1011 concerned an alternative assessment if bureau had not received necessary approvals from Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services prior to July 1, 2015.